GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST1/src/map4xip.xfst
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Xerox Research Center Europe - Grenoble
#
# Copyright (C)  Xerox Corporation
#
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	mappings of features for XIP 
# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller
# DATE:		10-Dec-2008
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# USAGE: 	fst -s lexicon.fst -l [ThisFile]
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

# NOTES:
# -  XIP requires the following input format:
#	word <tab> lemma <tab> tags
#    where tags must start with a "+" and must not be mixed with normal characters
# - tags are interpreted from left to right,
#   derivational tags must therefore be removed or renamed

print size
define LEX

# identify tags and markers
read regex LEX ;
single char sigma net
define SIG

read regex SIG & [ %+ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define MORTAG

read regex SIG & [ %^ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net
define MARKER

define CHAR	SIG & ? ;


# derivation and compound markers
define DRV   "^{" | "^}" | "^]"  ;
define SEP   "^=" ;
define CPD   ["^#" | "^-" ];

# new tags:
define NEWTAG	[ %+NAdj | %+NInf ];

# boundary for moving tags
define ANYTAG   MORTAG | NEWTAG ;
define CONV	%^%] ;
define DTAG	ANYTAG* DRV ;

define FUGE	"^/" (e) [s|n] ;

set flag-is-epsilon on


define MAP1 [
# move some derivational markers
	[..] -> %+PPres || %+PPres DTAG [ %+Adj | %+Noun ] _
.o.	[..] -> %+PPast || %+PPast DTAG [ %+Adj | %+Noun ] _
.o.	[..] -> %+PPrzu || %+PPrzu DTAG [ %+Adj | %+Noun ] _
.o.	[..] -> %+NInf	|| %+Inf "^]" %+Noun _
.o.	[..] -> %+NAdj	|| %+Adj DTAG %+Noun _

.o.	[..] -> %+Card	|| %+Card ANYTAG* DRV CHAR* %+Adj _

# remove others
.o.	[MORTAG|NEWTAG] -> 0 || _ $[DRV|SEP|CPD|%+Cpd]

].i;

read regex [ MAP1 .o. LEX ];
print size

set quit-on-fail off
substitute symbol 0   for "^]" ;
substitute symbol "}" for "^}" ;
substitute symbol "{" for "^}" ;
substitute symbol "=" for "^=" ;
substitute symbol "/" for "^/" ;
substitute symbol "#" for "^#" ;
substitute symbol "-" for "^-" ;
substitute symbol " " for "^_" ;
substitute symbol 0   for "^|" ;

define TMP1 %[ %* ;
define TMP2 %* %] ;

substitute defined TMP1 for "[*" ;
substitute defined TMP2 for "*]" ;

define LEX


define MAP2 [

# remove markers that appear *before* tags
	MARKER -> 0 || .#. ~$[MORTAG|NEWTAG] _ 
# add a plus before remaining markers
.o.	[..] -> %+ || _ MARKER
].i;


read regex [ MAP2 .o. LEX ];
print size
define LEX



define MAP3 [ 

# change tag for infinitive particle 
    	%+Infzu -> %+CInf     || %+Conj _
.o.    	%+Izu -> %+Infzu    || %+Ptcl _

# change tag name (otherwise the token consedered as end of sentence!)
.o. 	%+Sent -> %+SAdv	|| %+Ptcl _

# ordinals
.o. 	%+Num -> %+Adj 	|| _ [ %+Ord | %+Fract ]  $[%+Sg | %+Pl ]

# change some feature names
.o. 	%+Ptcl %+Neg -> %+Negat
].i ;

read regex [ MAP3 .o. LEX ];
print size

optimize net
